Utah statutes.
78B-13-306.   Enforcement of registered determination.

(1)  A court of this state may grant any relief normally available under the law of this state to enforce a registered child custody determination made by a court of another state.

(2)  A court of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify except in accordance with Part 2, Jurisdiction, a registered child custody determination of another state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

